Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1819
Director; rules and regulations; cooperate; agreements.

The director may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions, purposes, and intent of sections 2-1813 to 2-1825; and is authorized to cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture, the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, and other public or private agencies or groups and to enter into agreements with the same in carrying out the provisions of sections 2-1813 to 2-1825.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 11, p. 190.